Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5184.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 63D of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:-
“For the tax year beginning January 1, 2025 and ending December 31, 2025, any
payments that were made under this chapter may be treated as Massachusetts income tax
withholdings on behalf of the business owners”
of 1